Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 52.
COMMUNITY COLLEGES.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiative petition and adopted at the general election on Nov. 3, 1964, by a vote of 221,199 for and 219,618 against.

Cross References.

Community colleges, §§ 6-61-501 et seq., 6-61-601 et seq.

§ 1. General Assembly may establish districts to furnish community college instruction and technical training.

The General Assembly may by law provide for the establishment of districts for the purpose of providing community college instruction and technical training. The General Assembly shall prescribe the method of financing such communuity college and technical institutes, and may authorize the levy of a tax upon the taxable property in such districts for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, expansion, operation, and maintenance of facilities therefor.

§ 2. Prior approval of majority of qualified voters in proposed district required.

No such district shall be created and no such tax shall be levied upon the property in an established district except upon approval of a majority of the qualified electors of such proposed or established district voting thereon. Provided that any millage so approved by the electors of a district shall be a continuing levy until increased, reduced or repealed in such manner as may be provided by law, providing they shall ever remain a community college and shall never be extended into four-year institutions.